District of Columbia statutes.
38-1806.05

Matching funds.

The private, nonprofit corporation, to the extent practicable, shall provide matching funds, or in-kind contributions, or a combination thereof, for the purpose of carrying out the duties of the corporation under § 38-1806.04, as follows:

(1)

For fiscal year 1997, the nonprofit corporation shall provide matching funds or in-kind contributions of $1 for every $1 of federal funds provided under this subchapter for such year for activities under § 38-1806.04.

(2)

For fiscal year 1998, the nonprofit corporation shall provide matching funds or in-kind contributions of $3 for every $1 of federal funds provided under this subchapter for such year for activities under § 38-1806.04.

(3)

For fiscal year 1999, the nonprofit corporation shall provide matching funds or in-kind contributions of $5 for every $1 of federal funds provided under this subchapter for such year for activities under § 38-1806.04.

History

Apr. 26, 1996, 110 Stat. 1321 [268], Pub. L. 104-134, § 2605

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 31-2853.65.